Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-103.1, as
amended by Section 14, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (26 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 4-103.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4-103.1. A. A qualified elector may apply to register
to vote or update a registration to vote by:
Req. No. 11032 Page 1

1. Delivering by mail or otherwise a completed voter
registration application to the State Election Board or any county
election board;
2. Completing a voter registration application in person with
any official of an agency described in Section 4-109.2 of this
title;
3. Completing a voter registration application in person as
part of an application for issuance, renewal or change of address
for a driver license or issuance of a state identification card
issued pursuant to Section 6-105 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes with a designated representative of Service Oklahoma; or
4. Completing a voter registration application electronically
as provided in Section 4-109.4 of this title; or
4. The process outlined in Section 2 of this act.
B. The secretary of the county election board for the county of
the applicant's residence shall send to each applicant by
nonforwardable, first-class United States mail a notice of the
disposition of the application. Notice mailing costs shall be paid
by the county. Provided, the Secretary of the State Election Board
may authorize such notices to be sent by electronic means for voter
registration applications submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-103.2 of Title 26, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 11032 Page 2

Applicants for issuance, renewal, or change of address for a
driver license or issuance of a state identification card issued
pursuant to Section 6-105 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes with
a designated representative of Service Oklahoma, shall be
automatically registered to vote and the State Election Board shall
issue a voter identification card.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-103.3 of Title 26, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Applicants for issuance, renewal, or change of address for a
driver license or issuance of a state identification card issued
pursuant to Section 6-105 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes with
a designated representative of Service Oklahoma, shall be offered
the option to sign up for automated text message reminders for
upcoming elections sent by the State Election Board.
B. Service Oklahoma shall provide the State Election Board with
the phone information of applicants who agree to automated text
message reminders.
C. The State Election Board shall notify registered voters who
have agreed to automated text message reminders when their phone
information has been received and registered for automated text
message reminders.
D. The State Election Board shall provide automated text
message reminders when:
Req. No. 11032 Page 3

1. Important filing dates are approaching for absentee ballots;
and
2. The Sunday before any statewide election.
E. The State Election Board may contract with a third-party
vendor to provide automated text message reminders.
F. The State Election Board and Service Oklahoma shall be
permitted rulemaking authority to carry out the provisions of this
act.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11032 MJ 01/12/25













Req. No. 11032 Page 4